Louisiana, session 2026, HB1161.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development,
notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, is hereby authorized and
empowered to convey, transfer, assign, lease, or deliver any interest, excluding mineral
rights, the state may have to all or any portion of the following described parcel of property
to the city of Thibodaux:
(1) The Southwest Quarter (SW-1/4) of a certain lot of ground situated in the
Parish of Lafourche, in the Town of Thibodeaux, being known and
designated as Lot One Hundred Forty-Five (145) on the plan of said town
made by James D. Grinnage, Surveyor, on the 1st day of May 1842; said
Southwest Quarter being bounded on the North by North half of said Lot
145, belonging to E.P. Lorio, now or formerly, and on the South by Back
Street, on the East by the Southeast Quarter of said Lot 145, belonging to
Edward F. McCulla and Beatrice & Noble Dickinson, now or formerly, and
on the West by Lot 144 together with all buildings and improvements thereon
and all rights, ways, privileges, and servitudes thereto belonging or in
anywise appertaining.

(2) A certain fractional lot of ground or fractional town lot, situated in the
Town of Thibodeaux, Parish of Lafourche, State of Louisiana, being the
southern portion of Lot One Hundred Forty-Four (144) on the plan of the
Town of Thibodeaux, made and executed by James B. Grinnage, Deputy
Surveyor, on the 1st day of May 1842; said fractional lot measured eighty
feet, more or less, front on Canal Street, by the depth of Lot One Hundred
Forty-Four, or one hundred seventy feet, eight inches, bound in front or west
by Canal Street, on the North or towards Bayou Lafourche by other portions
of said Lot 144, now belonging to Heymann Levy & Company, on the South
by Back Street of the Town of Thibodeaux, and in the rear or East by Lot 145
on the plan of said Town of Thibodeaux, together with all buildings and
improvements thereon and all rights, ways, privileges and servitudes thereto
belonging or in anywise appertaining.

LESS AND EXCEPT:

A lot 42.66 feet by 85.53 feet bounded North by Eva S. Reed, South by Back
St., East by President St., West by Pauline Rudd.

Page 1 of 3

HB NO. 1161 ENROLLED
AND

LESS AND EXCEPT:

One (1) certain tract or parcel of land, together with all the improvements
situated thereon, and all of the rights, ways, privileges, servitudes and
advantages thereunder belonging or in anywise appertaining, municipal
address 1237 Canal Boulevard, Thibodeaux, LA, situated in Section 24,
Township 15 South, Range 16 East, Lafourche Parish, Louisiana, identified
as Parcel No. 1-3, as shown on Sheet No. 1 of the property map for STATE
PROJECT NO. H.009320, ACADIAN ROAD ROUNDABOUT, LA 20
(CANAL BLVD) AND LOCAL ROUTES, LAFOURCHE PARISH,
LOUISIANA, prepared by Robert A. Price, dated March 18, 2019, most
recently revised July 16, 2020, said map being attached hereto and made a
part hereof, which property is more particularly described as follows:
PARCEL NO. 1-3
From a point on the centerline of State Project No. H.009320, at Station
109+16.08, proceed S58°23'12"E a distance of 59.94 feet to the point of
beginning; thence proceed N21°32'17"E a distance of 88.16 feet to a point
and corner; thence proceed S16°52'36"E a distance of 112.88 feet to a point
and corner; thence proceed N68°13'59"W a distance of 80.14 feet to the point
of beginning. All of which comprises Parcel 1-3 as shown on Sheet 1 of the
Right of Way Plans of State Project No. H.009320, and contains an area of
3973.6 square feet or 0.091 acres.

Section 2. The secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development is
hereby authorized to enter into such agreements, covenants, conditions, and stipulations and
to execute such documents as necessary to properly effectuate any conveyance, transfer,
assignment, lease, or delivery of title, excluding mineral rights, to the property described in
Section 1 of this Act, and as more specifically described in any such agreements entered into
and documents executed by and between the secretary of the Department of Transportation
and Development and the city of Thibodaux, in exchange for consideration proportionate to
the appraised value of the property.
Section 3. The secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development,
notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, is hereby authorized and
empowered to convey, transfer, assign, lease, or deliver any interest, excluding mineral
rights, the state may have to all or any portion of the following described parcel of property
to the city of Gretna:
Approximately twelve acres of batture fronting approximately 1,200 lineal
feet along the right descending bank of the Mississippi River proximate to
the city of Gretna near the intersection of First Street and Huey P. Long
Boulevard in Jefferson Parish with a municipal address of 1 Huey P. Long
Avenue, Gretna, LA 70053.
Page 2 of 3

HB NO. 1161 ENROLLED
Section 4. The secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development is
hereby authorized to enter into such agreements, covenants, conditions, and stipulations and
to execute such documents as necessary to properly effectuate any conveyance, transfer,
assignment, lease, or delivery of title, excluding mineral rights, to the property described in
Section 3 of this Act, and as more specifically described in any such agreements entered into
and documents executed by and between the secretary of the Department of Transportation
and Development and the city of Gretna, in exchange for consideration proportionate to the
appraised value of the property.
Section 5. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3